Hawaii, session 2026, SB244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 188, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§188-    Parrotfish; prohibitions.  (a)  No person shall make any commercial sale of any parrotfish that has been caught by spearing. (b)  No person shall intentionally or knowingly spear any parrotfish in state waters after sunset or before sunrise." SECTION 2. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________